Hawaii statutes.
§712-1245 Promoting a harmful drug in the
second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting a harmful
drug in the second degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Possesses fifty or more capsules or tablets or
dosage units containing one or more of the harmful drugs or one or more of the
marijuana concentrates, or any combination thereof;

(b) Possesses one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances, of an aggregate weight of one- eighth ounce or more,
containing one or more of the harmful drugs or one or more of the marijuana
concentrates, or any combination thereof; or

(c) Distributes any harmful drug or any marijuana
concentrate in any amount.

(2) Promoting a harmful drug in the second
degree is a class B felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 119, §2 and c
163, §6(g); am L 1989, c 163, §4; gen ch 1992]

Revision Note

In subsection (1)(a), "or" deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next